Wisconsin, session 2025, AB731.
do enact as follows:AB731,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB731,211Section 2. 20.410 (1) (bp) of the statutes is created to read:AB731,3,21220.410 (1) (bp) Inmate telecommunications services. The amounts in the 13schedule to provide inmate telecommunications services under s. 302.092 (2) (a) 1and reimbursements to counties under s. 302.092 (6) (d) 2. for county jail or house of 2correction inmate telecommunications services.AB731,33Section 3. 20.410 (1) (gt) of the statutes is repealed.AB731,44Section 4. 20.410 (3) (bp) of the statutes is created to read:AB731,3,6520.410 (3) (bp) Juvenile telecommunications services. The amounts in the 6schedule to provide juvenile telecommunications services under s. 302.092 (2) (a).AB731,57Section 5. 301.105 of the statutes is repealed.AB731,68Section 6. 302.092 of the statutes is created to read:AB731,3,99302.092 Telecommunications service access. (1) In this section:AB731,3,1010(a) “Juvenile correctional facility” has the meaning given in s. 938.02 (10p).AB731,3,1111(b) “Juvenile detention facility” has the meaning given in s. 938.02 (10r).AB731,3,1212(c) “Telecommunications provider” has the meaning given in s. 196.01 (8p).AB731,3,1313(d) “Telecommunications service” has the meaning given in s. 196.01) (9m).AB731,3,1714(2) (a) The department shall ensure that each inmate of a state prison or 15juvenile being held in a juvenile correctional facility or juvenile detention facility is 16allowed to access all of the following telecommunications services at no cost to the 17person initiating or the person receiving the telecommunications services:AB731,3,18181. At least 180 minutes per week of telephone calling services.AB731,3,19192. At least 60 minutes per week of video calling services.AB731,3,20203. At least 100 text messages per week.AB731,4,221(b) Notwithstanding the minimum telecommunications service increments 22under par. (a), the department shall maintain, at a minimum, the level of access to 23telecommunications services that are in place on the effective date of this 1paragraph .... [LRB inserts date]. The department shall allow each inmate or 2juvenile to access additional telecommunications services if possible.AB731,4,63(c) The sheriff or person in charge of a county jail or house of correction shall 4ensure that each inmate of the county jail or house of correction is allowed to access 5all of the following telecommunications services at no cost to the person initiating or 6the person receiving the telecommunications services:AB731,4,771. At least 180 minutes per week of telephone calling services.AB731,4,882. At least 60 minutes per week of video calling services.AB731,4,993. At least 100 text messages per week.AB731,4,1510(d) Notwithstanding the minimum telecommunications service increments 11under par. (c), the sheriff or person in charge of a county jail or house of correction 12shall maintain, at a minimum, the level of access to telecommunications services 13that are in place on the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date]. The 14sheriff or person in charge of a county jail or house of correction shall allow each 15inmate to access additional telecommunications services if possible.AB731,4,1816(3) The number of minutes of telephone calling services and video calling 17services that an inmate or juvenile uses under sub. (2) shall be calculated by 18rounding the length of the actual access time to the nearest full minute.AB731,4,2119(4) Telecommunications services provided under sub. (2) may not be used to 20replace in-person visitation in any state prison, juvenile correctional facility, 21juvenile detention facility, or county jail or house of correction.AB731,5,222(5) Neither the department nor a sheriff or person in charge of a county jail or 23house of correction may charge an inmate or juvenile for telephone calling services 24or video calling services that exceed the minimums provided under sub. (2) (a) 1. 1and 2. and (c) 1. and 2. and may not charge any other person for telephone calling 2services or video calling services accessed by an inmate or juvenile.AB731,5,53(6) (a) The department and each county shall minimize costs for 4telecommunications services by consolidating contracts for telecommunications 5services if possible. AB731,5,116(b) The department shall contract with a telecommunications provider to 7provide telecommunications services to inmates and juveniles at state prisons, 8juvenile correctional facilities, and juvenile detention facilities as required under 9sub. (2) (a) and telecommunications services to inmates at county jails and houses 10of correction in each county that joins the department’s contract as provided under 11par. (c). AB731,5,1512(c) The department shall allow the sheriff or person in charge of a county jail 13or house of correction to join the contract under par. (b) to provide 14telecommunications services at the county jail or house of correction as required 15under sub. (2) (c) at no cost to the county. AB731,5,1816(d) If a sheriff or person in charge of a county jail or house of correction does 17not join the contract under par. (b), the sheriff or person in charge of the county jail 18or house of correction shall do all of the following:AB731,5,21191. Submit a report to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) within 90 days of the 20effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], and within 90 days after the 21end of each fiscal year thereafter, that contains all of the following information:AB731,5,2422a. A copy of all contracts that the county jail or house of corrections holds for 23telecommunications services, along with a summary of the rates and fees being 24paid by the county for inmate telecommunications services.AB731,6,21b. Data on inmate use of telecommunications services, including monthly call 2volume.AB731,6,43c. A description of why the county has not joined the department contract 4under par. (b).AB731,6,952. Submit a request to the department for reimbursement. The department 6shall, from the appropriation under s. 20.410 (1) (bp), reimburse the county for the 7cost of telecommunications services provided to inmates of the county jail or house 8of correction up to the amount those telecommunications services would have cost if 9the services had been provided under the contract under par. (b).AB731,6,1310(e) The department shall submit a report to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) 11within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], and 12within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year thereafter, that contains all of the 13following information:AB731,6,16141. A copy of all contracts for inmate and juvenile telecommunications services, 15along with a summary of the rates and fees being paid by the department for 16inmate and juvenile telecommunications services.AB731,6,18172. Data on inmate and juvenile use of telecommunications services, including 18monthly call and message volume.AB731,719Section 7. Nonstatutory provisions.AB731,6,2420(1) Telecommunications service access time phase-in. Notwithstanding 21s. 302.092 (2), for the first 18 months beginning after the effective date of this 22subsection, an inmate of a state prison or county jail or juvenile being held in a 23juvenile correctional facility or juvenile detention facility shall be allowed to access 24telecommunications services as follows:AB731,7,41(a) From the effective date of this paragraph until the last day of the 8th 2month after the effective date of this paragraph, each inmate or juvenile shall be 3allowed the level of access to telecommunications services that are in place on the 4effective date of this paragraph. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab731 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab731 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB731 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB731 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB731: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting